Utah statutes.
57-8a-201.   Payment of a common expense or assessment.
(1)  An owner shall pay the owner's proportionate share of:
(a)  the common expenses; and
(b)  any other assessments levied by the association.
(2)  A payment described in Subsection (1) shall be in the amount and at the
time determined by the board of directors in accordance with the terms of the:
(a)  declaration; or
(b)  bylaws.
(3)  An assessment levied against a lot is:
(a)  a debt of the owner at the time the assessment is made; and
(b)  collectible as a debt described in Subsection (3)(a).
